Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5794.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 101a. (1) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that all schools operated by the board or board of directors provide recess for pupils each school day. All of the following apply to recess provided by schools: (a) Recess does not include passing time to or from a school bus at the beginning or end of the school day. (b) Recess must be provided daily to all pupils enrolled in grades K to 5. Recess may be provided to pupils above grade 5. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, recess must take place outdoors unless weather policies require otherwise, and must be unstructured, child-directed play that may include organized games, but must not include the use of computers, electronic tablets, telephones, or videos. Computers, electronic tablets, telephones, and videos may be used during recess if that use is part of a pupil's individualized education program, section 504 plan, or related plan. (d) Recess does not include time spent dressing or undressing for outdoor play time. (e) A course for physical education is not considered to be recess. (f) Either of the following, as applicable: (i) For each school day that is 5 clock hours or longer, recess must be not less than 40 total minutes in length. The governing body of a public school shall determine how the minutes described in this subparagraph are divided. (ii) For each school day that is less than 5 clock hours, recess must be provided in a duration that is not less than 1/10 of the school day in which the pupils are in attendance. (g) Recess must not be withheld from any pupil for disciplinary or punitive reasons and may be withheld from pupils only if it poses an immediate threat to a pupil or other pupils and the district has made all reasonable efforts, to the greatest extent practicable, to resolve the threat. (2) The requirements in subsection (1)(a) to (g) must be modified only to the extent necessary to comply with a pupil's individualized education program, section 504 plan, or related plan. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Individualized education program" means that term as described in R 340.1721e of the Michigan Administrative Code. (b) "Section 504 plan" means a plan under section 504 of title V of the rehabilitation act of 1973, 29 USC 794.